Utah statutes.
20A-1-404.   Election controversies.
(1) (a) (i)  Whenever any controversy occurs between any election officer or
other person or entity charged with any duty or function under this title and
any candidate, or the officers or representatives of any political party, or
persons who have made nominations, either party to the controversy may file a
verified petition with the district court.
(ii)  If a petition is filed, the petitioner shall serve a copy of the
petition on the respondents on the same day that the petition is filed with
the court.
(b)  The verified petition shall identify concisely the nature of the
controversy and the relief sought.
(2)  After reviewing the petition, the court shall:
(a)  issue an order commanding the respondent named in the petition to appear
before the court to answer, under oath, to the petition;
(b)  summarily hear and dispose of any issues raised by the petition to
obtain:
(i)  strict compliance with all filing deadlines for financial disclosure
reports under:
(A)  Section 10-3-208, regarding campaign finance statements in municipal
elections;
(B)  Section 17-16-6.5, regarding campaign finance statements for county
offices;
(C)  Title 20A, Chapter 11, Part 2, State Office Candidates - Campaign
Organization and Financial Reporting Requirements;
(D)  Title 20A, Chapter 11, Part 3, Candidates for Legislative Office -
Campaign Organization and Financial Reporting Requirements;
(E)  Title 20A, Chapter 11, Part 4, Officeholder Financial Reporting
Requirements;
(F)  Title 20A, Chapter 11, Part 5, Political Party Registration and Financial
Reporting Requirements;
(G)  Title 20A, Chapter 11, Part 6, Political Action Committee Registration
and Financial Reporting Requirements;
(H)  Title 20A, Chapter 11, Part 7, Campaign Financial Reporting by
Corporations;
(I)  Title 20A, Chapter 11, Part 8, Political Issues Committees - Registration
and Financial Reporting;
(J)  Title 20A, Chapter 11, Part 13, State and Local School Board Candidates;
and
(K)  Title 20A, Chapter 12, Part 3, Campaign and Financial Reporting
Requirements for Judicial Retention Elections; and
(ii)  substantial compliance with all other provisions of this title by the
parties to the controversy; and
(c)  make and enter orders and judgments, and issue the process of the court
to enforce all of those orders and judgments.
